Hawaii statutes.
[§432D-9.5] Reserve credit for reinsurance.
Any health maintenance organization that takes credit for reserves on risks
ceded to a reinsurer shall be subject to provisions of chapter 431 related to
credit for reinsurance. [L 2000, c 74, §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next